scrapedcsv2yaml/yaml_output/VII_d.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     abwemaagwad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: abwemaagwad
     abwemaagwad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: abwemaagwak
     abwemaagwad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ebwemaagwak
     agadendaagwad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agadendaagwad
     agadendaagwad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agadendaagwak
     agadendaagwad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egadendaagwak
     agazitaagwad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agazitaagwad
     agazitaagwad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agazitaagwak
     agazitaagwad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egazitaagwak
     agaasadeyaabikad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasadeyaabikad
     agaasadeyaabikad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasadeyaabikak
     agaasadeyaabikad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egaasadeyaabikak
     agaasadeyaabiigad+VII+Imp+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasadeyaabiigad
     agaasadeyaabiigad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasadeyaabiigak
     agaasadeyaabiigad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egaasadeyaabiigak
     agaasadeyaakwad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasadeyaakwad
     agaasadeyaakwad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasadeyaakwak
     agaasadeyaakwad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egaasadeyaakwak
     agaasadeyiigad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasadeyiigad
     agaasadeyiigad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasadeyiigak
     agaasadeyiigad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egaasadeyiigak
     agaasadeyoonagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasadeyoonagad
     agaasadeyoonagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasadeyoonagak
     agaasadeyoonagad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egaasadeyoonagak
     agaasaabikad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasaabikad
     agaasaabikad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasaabikak
     agaasaabikad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egaasaabikak
     agaasaabiigad+VII+Imp+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasaabiigad
     agaasaabiigad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasaabiigak
     agaasaabiigad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egaasaabiigak
     agaasaakwad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasaakwad
     agaasaakwad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasaakwak
     agaasaakwad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egaasaakwak
     agaasaakwashkad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasaakwashkad
     agaasaakwashkad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasaakwashkak
     agaasaakwashkad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egaasaakwashkak
     agaasendaagwad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: agaasendaagwad
     agaasendaagwad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasendaagwak
     agaasendaagwad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egaasendaagwak
     agaasibagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasibagad
     agaasibagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasibagak
     agaasibagad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egaasibagak
     agaasiminagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasiminagad 
     agaasiminagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasiminagak
     agaasiminagad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egaasiminagak
     agaasinaagwad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasinaagwad
     agaasinaagwad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasinaagwak
     agaasinaagwad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egaasinaagwak
     agaasitaagwad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasitaagwad
     agaasitaagwad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasitaagwak
     agaasitaagwad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egaasitaagwak
     agaasiigad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasiigad 
     agaasiigad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasiigak
     agaasiigad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egaasiigak
     agaasiinad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasiinad
     agaasiinad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasiinak
     agaasiinad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egaasiinak
     agaasoonagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasoonagad
     agaasoonagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasoonagak
     agaasoonagad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egaasoonagak
     agwaagomaagwad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwaagomaagwad
     agwaagomaagwad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwaagomaagwak
     agwaagomaagwad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: egwaagomaagwak
     agwaagopogwad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwaagopogwad
     agwaagopogwad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwaagopogwak
     agwaagopogwad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egwaagopogwak
     agwaagwaabikad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwaagwaabikad 
     agwaagwaabikad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwaagwaabikak
     agwaagwaabikad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egwaagwaabikak
     akoonagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: akoonagad
     akoonagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: akoonagak
     akoonagad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ekoonagak
     akoosagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: akoosagad
     akoosagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: akoosagak
     akoosagad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ekoosagak
     akwaabikad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: akwaabikad
     akwaabikad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: akwaabikak
     akwaabikad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ekwaabikak
     akwaabiigad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: akwaabiigad 
     akwaabiigad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: akwaabiigak
     akwaabiigad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ekwaabiigak
     akwaakwad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: akwaakwad
     akwaakwad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: akwaakwak
     akwaakwad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ekwaakwak
     akwegad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: akwegad 
     akwegad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: akwegak
     akwegad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ekwegak
     anama'e-giizhigad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: anama'e-giizhigad 
     anama'e-giizhigad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: anama'e-giizhigak
     anama'e-giizhigad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: enama'e-giizhigak
     andawendaagwad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: andawendaagwad
     andawendaagwad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: andawendaagwak
     andawendaagwad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: endawendaagwak
     angomaagwad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: angomaagwad
     angomaagwad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: angomaagwak
     angomaagwad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: engomaagwak
     angonaagwad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: angonaagwad
     angonaagwad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: angonaagwak
     angonaagwad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: engonaagwak
     ani-naagwad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ani-naagwad 
     ani-naagwad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ani-naagwak
     ani-naagwad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: eni-naagwak
     animaanakwad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animaanakwad 
     animaanakwad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animaanakwak
     animaanakwad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: enimaanakwak
     animaanimad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animaanimad
     animaanimad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animaanimak
     animaanimad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: enimaanimak
     animweweyaanimad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animweweyaanimad
     animweweyaanimad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animweweyaanimak
     apagadaanimad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apagadaanimad
     apagadaanimad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apagadaanimak
     apagadaanimad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: epagadaanimak
     apiichi-giizhigad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiichi-giizhigad 
     apiichi-giizhigad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiichi-giizhigak
     apiichi-giizhigad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: epiichi-giizhigak
     apiichijiishkiwagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiichijiishkiwagad
     apiichijiishkiwagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiichijiishkiwagak
     apiichijiishkiwagad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: epiichijiishkiwagak
     apiichiigad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiichiigad
     apiichiigad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiichiigak
     apiichiigad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: epiichiigak
     apiisinaagwad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiisinaagwad
     apiisinaagwad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiisinaagwak
     apiisinaagwad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: epiisinaagwak
     apiitadeyiigad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiitadeyiigad
     apiitadeyiigad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiitadeyiigak
     apiitadeyiigad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: epiitadeyiigak
     apiitakamigad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiitakamigad
     apiitakamigad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiitakamigak
     apiitakamigad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: epiitakamigak
     apiitashkad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiitashkad
     apiitashkad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiitashkak
     apiitashkad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: epiitashkak
     apiitaabikad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiitaabikad
     apiitaabikad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiitaabikak
     apiitaabikad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: epiitaabikak
     apiitaanimad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiitaanimad 
     apiitaanimad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiitaanimak
     apiitaanimad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: epiitaanimak
     apiitendaagwad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: apiitendaagwad
     apiitendaagwad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiitendaagwak
     apiitendaagwad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: epiitendaagwak
     apiitinigwad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiitinigwad 
     apiitinigwad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiitinigwak
     apiitinigwad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: epiitinigwak
     apiitoonagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiitoonagad
     apiitoonagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiitoonagak
     apiitoonagad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: epiitoonagak
     asabaabikad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: asabaabikad
     asabaabikad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: asabaabikad\k
     asabaabikad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: esabaabikak
     ashi-bezhigo-anama'e-giizhikwagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ashi-bezhigo-anama'e-giizhikwagad
     ashi-bezhigo-diba'iganed+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ashi-bezhigo-diba'iganed
     ashi-bezhigo-diba'iganed+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ashi-bezhigo-diba'iganek
     ashi-bezhigo-diba'iganed+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: eshi-bezhigo-diba'iganek
     ashi-bezhigo-giiziswagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ashi-bezhigo-giiziswagad
     ashi-bezhigo-giiziswagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ashi-bezhigo-giiziswagak
     ashkibiigisagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ashkibiigisagad
     ashkibiigisagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ashkibiigisagak
     ashkibiigisagad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: eshkibiigisagak
     ashkiminagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ashkiminagad
     ashkiminagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ashkiminagak
     ashkiminagad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: eshkiminagak
     ashkipogwad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ashkipogwad
     ashkipogwad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ashkipogwak
     ashkipogwad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: eshkipogwak
     ashkiiwagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ashkiiwagad
     ashkiiwagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ashkiiwagak
     ashkiiwagad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: eshkiiwagak
     aabadad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabadad
     aabadad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabadak
     aabadad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayaabadak
     aabaakawad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabaakawad
     aabaakawad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabaakawak
     aabaakawad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayaabaakawak
     aabaakawaanimad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabaakawaanimad
     aabaakawaanimad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabaakawaanimak
     aabidaanimad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabidaanimad
     aabidaanimad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabidaanimak
     aabidaanimad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayaabidaanimak
     aabitaa-dibikad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabitaa-dibikad 
     aabitaa-dibikad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabitaa-dibikak
     aabitaa-dibikad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayaabitaa-dibikak
     aakomaagwad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aakomaagwad
     aakomaagwad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aakomaagwak
     aakomaagwad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayaakomaagwak
     aanawendaagwad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aanawendaagwad
     aanawendaagwad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aanawendaagwak
     aanawendaagwad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayaanawendaagwak
     aanjinaagwad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aanjinaagwad
     aanjinaagwad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aanjinaagwak
     aanjinaagwad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayaanjinaagwak
     aanzinaagwad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aanzinaagwad
     aanzinaagwad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aanzinaagwak
     aanzinaagwad+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayaanzinaagwak
     aazhawaanimad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aazhawaanimad
     aazhawaanimad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aazhawaanimak
